District of Columbia statutes.
16-3701

Demand prior to action; costs.

In an action of replevin brought to recover personal property to which the plaintiff is entitled, that is alleged to have been wrongfully taken by or to be in the possession of and wrongfully detained by the defendant, it is not necessary to demand possession of the property before bringing the action; but the costs of the action may be awarded as the court orders.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 604, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 16-3701.
1981 Ed., § 16-3701.
Superior court jurisdiction, see § 11-921.
Attachment of property in replevin action, see § 16-517.